Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 4 Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision
42-9-82.
Powers of Governor with respect to compact.

With respect to the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision set out in Code Section 42-9-81:

The Governor shall by executive order establish the initial composition, terms, and compensation of the Georgia State Council for Interstate Adult Offender Supervision required by Article IV of that compact, with the Governor making the appointments to those positions; except that any appointment to a position representing the legislative branch shall be made jointly by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President of the Senate and any appointment to a position representing the judicial branch shall be made by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court;

The Governor shall by executive order establish the qualifications, term, and compensation of the compact administrator required by Article IV of that compact, with the state council making the appointment of the compact administrator;

The Governor shall by executive order provide for any other matters necessary for implementation of the compact at the time that it becomes effective; and

Except as otherwise provided for in this Code section, the board may promulgate rules or regulations necessary to implement and administer the compact, subject to the provisions of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

42-9-82

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1297, § 1.